data/hungarian.aff
SFX o Y 342
SFX o   ztik szátok       sztik                     [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ztik szátok       sztik                     [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ztik szák         sztik                     [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ztik szák         sztik                     [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ztik szuk         sztik                     [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ztik szuk         sztik                     [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ztik sza          sztik                     [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   zt   szátok       szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   zt   szák         szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   zt   szuk         szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   zt   szam         szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   zt   szalak       szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   zt   szad         szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   zt   sza          szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   zik  szátok       szik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   zik  szák         szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   zik  szák         szik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   zik  szuk         szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   zik  szuk         szik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   zik  szam         szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   zik  szalak       szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   zik  szad         szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   zik  sza          szik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   zik  sza          szik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   zik  dzátok       dzik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   zik  dzák         dzik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   zik  dzák         dzik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   zik  dzuk         dzik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   zik  dzuk         dzik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   zik  dza          dzik                      [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   zik  dza          dzik                      [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   z    szák         sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   z    szuk         sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   z    szam         sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   z    szalak       sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   z    szad         sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   z    sza          sz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   z    dzák         dz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   z    dzuk         dz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   z    dza          dz                        [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   tik  ssátok       [üöieuoa]tik              [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   tik  ssák         [üöieuoa]tik              [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   tik  ssuk         [üöieuoa]tik              [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   tik  ssa          [üöieuoa]tik              [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   t    ssátok       [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   t    ssák         [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   t    ssuk         [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   t    ssam         [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   t    ssalak       [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   t    ssad         [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   t    ssa          [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   t    sd           [üöieuoa]t                [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   t    d            szt                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   l    lak          ll                        [PRES_INDIC_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   zátok        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   zátok        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   zák          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   zák          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   zuk          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   zuk          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   zam          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   ik   zalak        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   zad          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   ik   za           [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   za           [^dsbkmnyzr]zik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   tátok        szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   tátok        [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   tátok        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   ták          szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   ták          [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   ták          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   tuk          szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   tuk          [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   tuk          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   tam          szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   ik   tam          [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   ik   tam          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   ik   talak        szik                      [PAST_INDIC_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   talak        [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   talak        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   tad          szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   ik   tad          [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   ik   tad          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   ik   ta           szik                      [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   ta           [^ldrz]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   ta           [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   sátok        sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   sátok        sik                       [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   sátok        [^szüöieuoa]tik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   sák          sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   sák          sik                       [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   sák          [^szüöieuoa]tik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   suk          sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   suk          sik                       [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   suk          [^szüöieuoa]tik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   sam          sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_1]
SFX o   ik   salak        sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_SG_1_OBJ_2]
SFX o   ik   sad          sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_2]
SFX o   ik   sa           sik                       [SUBJ/IMPER_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   sa           sik                       [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   sa           [^szüöieuoa]tik           [PRES_INDIC_DEF_SG_3]
SFX o   ik   ottátok      [s][ld]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   ottátok      [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik   [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_2]
SFX o   ik   ották        [s][ld]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   ották        [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik   [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_3]
SFX o   ik   ottuk        [s][ld]ik                 [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
SFX o   ik   ottuk        [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik   [PAST_INDIC_DEF_PL_1]
