data/hungarian.dic
ír/ŠĽŁOoŤ	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
áradoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ácsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zsugorgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zabláz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
választat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vonalazik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
villogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
varázsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤdX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vadul/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
udvarolgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tárol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
turmixol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
transzferál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
toldat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tiltat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tarol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
találkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sóhajtozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szór/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
számítgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szurdos/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szokik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szigonyoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szarvaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szakajtat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	szakajt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sulykol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sraffoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sodorint/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sikongat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sajdít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
rágogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
riposztoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
referál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
párnáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
problémázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pocsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
patronál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
osztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nüanszíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyilvántartat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	nyilvántart[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mélázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mormog/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
maszkol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lóg/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
liofilizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lapogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kábít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kosztol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
konszignál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
klónoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kattintat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kancsít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
javasol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤdX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
inspekciózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
húzat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	húz[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hullajt/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hazudtol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hallat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gyújtat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	gyújt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
glorifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fájdít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
formalizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
firtat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
faktorizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
elszociografizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dúcol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dobog/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
demobilizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csúsztat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csinál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
cirkalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bágyadoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bontat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	bont[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
beír/ŠĽŁOoŤ	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
balzsamoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
amputál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ajnároz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
